Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201076-2225
Civil and criminal immunity.

The members of the board and
the board's employees or persons under contract with the board shall
be immune from any civil action or criminal prosecution for initiating or
assisting in any lawful investigation of the actions of or any disciplinary
proceeding concerning a credential holder pursuant to the Real Property Appraiser
Act if such action is taken without malicious intent and in the reasonable
belief that it was taken pursuant to the powers vested in the members of the
board or such employees or
persons.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 25;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 26;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 21;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 16;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 45;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 8.